Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 12. Enforcement by Administrator

38-13-1201.
Judicial action to enforce liability.

If a determination under section 38-13-1011 becomes final and is not subject to administrative or judicial review, the administrator may commence an action in the district court for the city and county of Denver or in an appropriate court of another state to enforce the determination and secure payment or delivery of past due, unpaid, or undelivered property. The action must be brought not later than one year after the determination becomes final.

In an action under subsection (1) of this section, if no court in this state has jurisdiction over the defendant, the administrator may commence an action in any court having jurisdiction over the defendant.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 452, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1202.
Interstate and international agreement - cooperation.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the administrator may:

Exchange information with another state or foreign country relating to property presumed abandoned or relating to the possible existence of property presumed abandoned; and

Authorize in a record another state or foreign country or a person acting on behalf of the other state or country to examine its records of a putative holder as provided in part 10 of this article 13.

An exchange or examination under subsection (1) of this section may be done only if the state or foreign country has confidentiality and security requirements substantially equivalent to those in part 14 of this article 13 or agrees in a record to be bound by this state’s confidentiality and security requirements.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1203.
Action involving another state or foreign country.

The administrator may join another state or foreign country to examine and seek enforcement of this article 13 against a putative holder.

On request of another state or foreign country, the attorney general may commence an action on behalf of the other state or country to enforce, in this state, the law of the other state or country against a putative holder subject to a claim by the other state or country, if the other state or country agrees to pay costs incurred by the attorney general in the action.

The administrator may request the official authorized to enforce the unclaimed property law of another state or foreign country to commence an action to recover property in the other state or country on behalf of the administrator. This state shall pay the costs, including reasonable attorney fees and expenses, incurred by the other state or foreign country in an action under this subsection (3).

The administrator may pursue an action on behalf of this state to recover property subject to this article 13 but delivered to the custody of another state if the administrator believes the property is subject to the custody of the administrator.

The administrator may retain an attorney in this state, another state, or a foreign country to commence an action to recover property on behalf of the administrator and may agree to pay attorney fees based in whole or in part on a fixed fee, hourly fee, or percentage of the amount or value of property recovered in the action.

Expenses incurred by this state in an action under this section may be paid from property received under this article 13 or the net proceeds of the property. Expenses paid to recover property shall not be deducted from the amount that is subject to a claim under this article 13 by the owner.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1204.
Interest and penalty for failure to act in timely manner.

A holder that fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this article 13 shall pay to the administrator interest at the annual rate specified in section 39-21-110.5 on the property or value of the property from the date the property should have been reported, paid, or delivered to the administrator until the date reported, paid, or delivered.

Except as otherwise provided in section 38-13-1205 or 38-13-1206, the administrator may require a holder that fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this article 13 to pay to the administrator, in addition to interest included under subsection (1) of this section, a civil penalty of two hundred dollars for each day the duty is not performed, up to a cumulative maximum amount of five thousand dollars.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 454, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1205.
Other civil penalties.

If a holder enters into a contract or other arrangement for the purpose of evading an obligation under this article 13 or otherwise willfully fails to perform a duty imposed on the holder under this article 13, the administrator may require the holder to pay the administrator, in addition to interest as provided in section 38-13-1204 (1), a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day the obligation is evaded or the duty is not performed, up to a cumulative maximum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars, plus twenty-five percent of the amount or value of property that should have been but was not reported, paid, or delivered as a result of the evasion or failure to perform.

If a holder makes a fraudulent report under this article 13, the administrator may require the holder to pay to the administrator, in addition to interest under section 38-13-1204 (1), a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day from the date the report was made until corrected, up to a cumulative maximum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars, plus twenty-five percent of the amount or value of any property that should have been reported but was not included in the report or was underreported.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 454, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1206.
Waiver of interest and penalty.

The administrator shall waive a penalty under section 38-13-1204 (2) if the administrator determines that the holder acted in good faith and without negligence.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 454, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.